src/fst/phonology.twolc
!    =================================== !
!! # The Qʼeqchiʼ morphophonological/twolc rules file 
!    =================================== !

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-kek/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! ## Alphabet, sets
Alphabet
 a b c e h i j k l m n o p q r s t u w x y z '
 A B C E H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U W X Y Z '

!  %{Poss.Sg1%}:0
!  %{Poss.Sg2%}:0
!  %{Poss.Sg3%}:0
!  %{Poss.Pl1%}:0
!  %{Poss.Pl2%}:0
!  %{Poss.Pl3%}:0
!  %{Erg.Pl3%}:0
!  %{RECPST%}:0
!  %{Fut%}:0
!  %{HAB%}:0
!  %{REMPST%}:0
%{K%}:k
%{A%}:a
%{FutA%}:0
%{I%}:i
%<:0

 ;

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u ;
 Cns = b c h j k l m n p q r s t w x y z ' ;

!! ## Rules
Rules

!Rules for intransitive conjugations
"Present habitual vowell harmony"
%{A%}:Vx <=> n _ %{K%}: %< Vy ;
        where Vy in ( a e i o u %< )
              Vx in ( a e 0 o u a ) 
        matched ;

"Present habitual k deletion"
%{K%}:0 <=> %{A%}: _ %< [ i | %< ] ;

"Future irrealis 3rd person a elongation"
%{FutA%}:a <=> t _ %{FutA%}: %< %< ;

"Future 3rd person a"
%{FutA%}:a <=> t %{FutA%}: _ %< %< ;


"Imperative, narrative past, and negative imperative i"
%{I%}:Vx <=> _ %< Vy ;
        where Vy in ( a e i o u %< )
              Vx in ( 0 0 0 0 0 i ) 
        matched ;

! ! ### Rules for possessive and ergative prefixes

! "First Person possessive singular prevocalic form"
! %{Poss.Sg1%}:w <=> _ %{Poss.Sg1%}: Vow ; 

! "First person possessive singular preconsonantal form Rule 1"
! %{Poss.Sg1%}:i <=> _ %{Poss.Sg1%}: Cns ;

! "First person possessive singular preconsonantal form Rule 2"
! %{Poss.Sg1%}:n <=> %{Poss.Sg1%}: _ Cns ;

! "Second person possessive singular prevocalic form"
! %{Poss.Sg2%}:w <=> a: a: _ Vow ;

! "Third person possessive singular prevocalic form"
! %{Poss.Sg3%}:r <=> _ Vow ;

! "Third person possessive singular preconsonantal form"
! %{Poss.Sg3%}:x <=> _ Cns ;

! "First person possessive plural preconsonantal form"
! %{Poss.Pl1%}:a <=> q: _ Cns ;

! "Second person possessive plural prevocalic form"
! %{Poss.Pl2%}:r <=> e: e: _ Vow ;

! "Third person possessive plural prevocalic form"
! %{Poss.Pl3%}:r <=> _ Vow ;

! "Third person possessive plural preconsonantal form"
! %{Poss.Pl3%}:x <=> _ Cns ;

! "Third person ergative plural preconsonantal form"
! %{Erg.Pl3%}:x <=> ': _ Cns ;

! "Third person ergative plural prevocalic form"
! %{Erg.Pl3%}:r <=> ': _ Vow ;

! !Rules for Recent Past tense
! "Recent past before Sg3 ergative preconsonantal prefix"
! %{RECPST%}:i <=> x: _ %{Poss.Sg3%}: Cns ;

! !Rules for future tense
! "Future tense before Sg1 ergative prevocalic prefix Rule 1"
! %{Fut%}:i <=> t: _ %{Fut%}: %{Poss.Sg1%}: %{Poss.Sg1%}: Vow ;

! "Future tense before Sg1 ergative prevocalic prefix Rule 2"
! %{Fut%}:n <=> %{Fut%}: _ %{Poss.Sg1%}: %{Poss.Sg1%}: Vow ;

! "Future tense before Pl1 ergative prevocalic prefix Rule 1"
! %{Fut%}:a <=> t: _ %{Fut%}: q: %{Poss.Pl1%}: Vow ;

! "Future tense before Pl1 ergative prevocalic prefix Rule 2"
! %{Fut%}:a <=> %{Fut%}: _ q: %{Poss.Pl1%}: Vow ;

! "Future tense before Sg3 ergative prevocalic prefix Rule 1"
! %{Fut%}:a <=> t: _ %{Fut%}: %{Poss.Sg3%}: Vow ;

! "Future tense before Sg3 ergative prevocalic prefix Rule 2"
! %{Fut%}:a <=> %{Fut%}: _ %{Poss.Sg3%}: Vow ;

! "Future tense before Sg3 ergative preconsonantal prefix"
! %{Fut%}:i <=> t: _ %{Fut%}: %{Poss.Sg3%}: Cns ;

! "Future tense before Pl1 ergative preconsonantal prefix"
! %{Fut%}:a <=> t: _ %{Fut%}: q: %{Poss.Pl1%}: Cns ;

! "Future and nonfuture suffix"
! %{K%}:q <=> .#. t: %{Fut%}: %{Fut%}: ?+ _ ;

! !Rules for Present habitual tense
! "Present habitual before Sg1 absolutive prefix"
! a:0 <=> n: _ %{HAB%}: i: n: ;

! "Present habitual before Sg1 ergative preconsonantal prefix"
! a:0 <=> n: _ %{HAB%}: %{Poss.Sg1%}: %{Poss.Sg1%}: Cns ;

! "Present habitual before Sg1 ergative prevocalic prefix Rule 1"
! a:i <=> n: _ %{HAB%}: %{Poss.Sg1%}: %{Poss.Sg1%}: Vow ;

! "Present habitual before Sg1 ergative prevocalic prefix Rule 2"
! %{HAB%}:n <=> n: a:i _ %{Poss.Sg1%}: %{Poss.Sg1%}: Vow ;

! "Present habitual before Sg2 absolutive prefix"
! %{HAB%}:k <=> a: _ a: t: ;

! "Present habitual before Sg2 ergative prefixes Rule 1"
! %{HAB%}:k <=> a: _ a: a: %{Poss.Sg2%}: ;

! "Present habitual before Sg2 ergative prefixes Rule 2"
! a:0 <=> n: a: %{HAB%}: a: _ %{Poss.Sg2%}: ; 

! "Present habitual before Pl1 absolutive prefix Rule 1"
! a:o <=> n: _ %{HAB%}: o: o: ;

! "Present habitual before Pl1 absolutive prefix Rule 2"
! %{HAB%}:k <=> n: a:o _ o: o: ;

! "Present habitual before Pl2 absolutive prefix Rule 1"
! a:e <=> n: _ %{HAB%}: e: x: ;

! "Present habitual before Pl2 absolutive prefix Rule 2"
! %{HAB%}:k <=> n: a: _ e: x: ;

! "Present habitual before Pl2 ergative prefix Rule 1"
! a:e <=> n: _ %{HAB%}: e: e: ;

! "Present habitual before Pl2 ergative prefix Rule 2"
! %{HAB%}:k <=> n: a: _ e: e: ;

! "Present habitual before Pl3 ergative and absolutive prefixes Rule 1"
! a:e <=> n: _ %{HAB%}: e: ': ;

! "Present habitual before Pl3 ergative prefixes Rule 2"
! %{HAB%}:k <=> n: a: _ e: ': ;

! !Rules for remote past tense
! "Remote past before prefixes beginning in a consonant"
! %{REMPST%}:i <=> k: _ Cns ;

! "Remote past shorten aa to a in Sg2 ergative prefixes"
! a:0 <=> k: %{REMPST%}: _ a: %{Poss.Sg2%}: ;

! "Remote past shorten ee to e in Pl2 ergative prevocalic prefixes"
! e:0 <=> k: %{REMPST%}: _ e: %{Poss.Pl2%}: Vow ;

! "Remote past before Sg1 ergative prevocalic prefixes"
! %{REMPST%}:i <=> k: _ %{Poss.Sg1%}: %{Poss.Sg1%}: Vow ;

! "Remote past before Sg3 ergative prefixes"
! %{REMPST%}:i <=> k: _ %{Poss.Sg3%}: ;
